Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 3. Leaves of Absence.

Sec. 39.20.200.
Computation of personal leave.

Officers and employees of the state who are first employed before July 1, 2013, in a position for which leave may accrue are entitled to personal leave with pay that accrues as follows:

two days for each full monthly pay period in the case of officers and employees with less than two years of service;

two and one-quarter days for each full monthly pay period in the case of officers and employees with two but less than five years of service;

two and one-half days for each full monthly pay period in the case of officers and employees with five but less than 10 years of service;

three days for each full monthly pay period in the case of officers and employees with 10 years or more of service.

Personal leave accrued by an officer or employee during each pay period shall be converted monthly to a cash value by multiplying the hours accrued during the pay periods in that month by the officer’s or employee’s annualized hourly rate of pay for the pay period. The resulting amount shall be added to the cash value amounts calculated for previous pay periods. The total of all of the cash values is the cash value of the officer’s or employee’s personal leave balance.

Officers and employees of the state who are first employed on or after July 1, 2013, in a position for which leave may accrue are entitled to personal leave with pay that accrues as follows:

one and three-quarters days for each full monthly pay period in the case of officers and employees with less than two years of service;

two days for each full monthly pay period in the case of officers and employees with two but less than five years of service;

two and one-quarter days for each full monthly pay period in the case of officers and employees with five but less than 10 years of service;

two and one-half days for each full monthly pay period in the case of officers and employees with 10 but less than 15 years of service;

three days for each full monthly pay period in the case of officers and employees with 15 years or more of service.

History.

(§ 11-5-6 a ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 182 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1960; am § 10 ch 148 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 136 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 4 FSSLA 1996; am §§ 4, 5 ch 47 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For leave rules, see 2 AAC 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “who are first employed before July 1, 2013, in a position for which leave may accrue”, in (a)(4), inserted “of” preceding “service”; added (c).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 43, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996 provides that, for the purposes of implementing subsection (b), “the beginning total cash value of an officer’s or employee’s personal leave balance on July 1, 1996 is calculated by multiplying the officer’s or employee’s personal leave balance as of June 30, 1996 by the officer’s or employee’s annualized hourly rate of pay on July 1, 1996.” Section 44, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996 provides that nothing in that Act, which added subsection (b), “modifies or terminates the terms of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on July 1, 1996.” Under § 45, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996, the provisions of that act, which added subsection (b), are not severable, notwithstanding AS

01.10.030

.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the 2013 changes to this section made in secs. 4 and 5, ch. 47, SLA 2013 (SB 95), see 2013 Senate Journal 888 — 890.

Sec. 39.20.210.
Determining years of service.

In determining years of service for the purpose of computing personal leave, all service with the Territory and State of Alaska is included.
A change in the rate of accrual of personal leave by an officer or employee takes effect upon the beginning of the monthly pay period following the monthly pay period in which the officer or employee completes the prescribed period of service.

History.

(§ 11-5-6 b ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 182 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 136 SLA 1978)

Sec. 39.20.220.
Requirement that employment be continuous.

Notwithstanding AS

39.20.200

, an officer or employee is entitled to personal leave only after having been employed currently for a continuous period of 30 days under one or more appointments without break in service.
When an officer or employee completes a period of continuous employment of 30 days, an amount of personal leave is credited to the officer or employee equal to the amount which, but for this section, would have accrued under AS

39.20.200

during the period.

History.

(§ 11-5-6 c ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 182 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 136 SLA 1978)

Sec. 39.20.225.
Use of personal leave.

An officer or employee may take personal leave at any time business permits upon permission by the head of the department or agency for which the officer or employee works.

An officer or employee may take personal leave for medical reasons, regardless of whether business permits, upon permission by the head of the department or agency for which the officer or employee works. A department or agency head shall grant personal leave for medical reasons if the department or agency head is satisfied that the officer or employee is absent for medical reasons. The taking of personal leave for medical reasons shall be reduced by the amount of wage continuation payments made under AS 23.30 (Alaska Workers’ Compensation Act). The following constitute “medical reasons” and are subject to the conditions noted:

medical disability of an officer or employee is a medical reason for taking personal leave. A department or agency head may require a doctor’s certificate showing the disability if the absence exceeds three consecutive working days;

medical disability of a member of an officer’s or employee’s immediate family is a medical reason for taking personal leave if the disability is such that the attendance of the officer or employee is required. A department or agency head may require a doctor’s certificate showing the disability if the absence exceeds three consecutive working days;

a medical condition of an officer or employee that makes presence at work a danger to the health of fellow employees is a medical reason for taking personal leave. A department or agency head may require a doctor’s certificate showing the condition if the absence exceeds three consecutive working days;

pregnancy and childbirth or the placement of a child, other than the employee’s stepchild, with the employee for adoption is a medical reason for an officer or employee to take personal leave;

death of a member of an officer’s or employee’s immediate family is a medical reason for taking personal leave. No more than five days of personal leave may be taken for this purpose.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, each officer or employee shall, during each 12-month period, take at least 10 days of personal leave. If the officer or employee does not take at least 10 days of personal leave during a 12-month period, the difference between 10 days and the amount of personal leave taken shall be canceled without pay unless the department or agency head certifies in writing that the officer or employee was denied the opportunity to take 10 days of personal leave during the 12-month period.

History.

(§ 4 ch 136 SLA 1978; am § 8 ch 96 SLA 1992; am § 6 ch 47 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For leave, see 2 AAC 7, art. 11.

For leave rules, see 2 AAC 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective December 16, 2013, in (c), substituted “Except as otherwise provided in this section, each officer or employee” for “Each officer and employee”, substituted “10 days” for “five days” four times.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the 2013 changes to this section made in sec. 6, ch. 47, SLA 2013 (SB 95), see 2013 Senate Journal 888 — 890.

Sec. 39.20.230.
When annual leave may be taken. [Repealed, § 15 ch 136 SLA 1978.
For current law see AS 39.20.225.]

Sec. 39.20.240.
Accumulation of personal leave.

Except as provided in AS

39.20.225(c)

and this section, personal leave that is not taken by an officer or employee during a 12-month period accumulates for use in succeeding 12-month periods.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, an officer or employee may not accumulate more than 1,000 hours of personal leave at the end of each 12-month period for use in succeeding 12-month periods.

The personnel board may adopt regulations to allow an exemption from the requirements of (b) of this section if the department or agency head certifies in writing that the officer or employee accumulated more than 1,000 hours of leave at the end of a 12-month period because the officer or employee was denied the opportunity to use personal leave.

Each officer or employee who has a balance of accumulated personal leave in excess of 400 hours on December 16, 2013, shall, until that balance becomes 400 hours or less,

be exempt from the limitation under (b) of this section; and

take at least 15 days of personal leave during each 12-month period.

Unless the head of an agency or department certifies in writing that an officer or employee of the agency or department who is subject to the requirements of (d) of this section was denied the opportunity to take at least 15 days of personal leave during a 12-month period, 15 days of personal leave minus the number of days of personal leave that was taken by the officer or employee shall be subtracted from the accrued personal leave balance of the officer or employee. The leave subtracted from accrued personal leave shall be canceled without pay.

History.

(§ 11-5-6 e ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 182 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 151 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 136 SLA 1978; am §§ 7, 8 ch 47 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective December 16, 2013, in (a), inserted “and this section,” following “provided in AS

39.20.225(c)

”; added (b) through (e).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the 2013 changes to this section made in ch. 47, SLA 2013 (SB 95), see 2013 Senate Journal 888 — 890.

Sec. 39.20.245.
Donation of leave.

An officer or employee may donate one or more days of personal leave a year to the memorial education revolving loan fund, or to an education loan account in the fund, under AS

14.43.250

—

14.43.325

. The commissioner of administration shall pay to the account of the memorial education revolving loan fund, or to an education loan account in the fund, an amount equal to the value of the day or days of personal leave contributed by the officer or employee.

An officer or employee, with the approval of the person authorizing the employment, may donate accrued personal or annual leave to another officer or employee only for use as leave for medical reasons. The official responsible for employee accounts shall debit the donor’s personal or annual leave account and credit the donee’s personal leave account, or sick leave account, as appropriate, for medical reasons only, by converting the donated leave into cash value at the donor’s rate of pay and reconverting the cash value to hours of leave at the donee’s rate of pay. Leave donated under this subsection is not leave taken by the donor for purposes of AS

39.20.225(c)

. An employee who is covered by a collective bargaining agreement may donate leave to or receive donations of leave from an employee or officer who is not covered by a collective bargaining agreement, notwithstanding AS

39.20.310

(7) and (8).

History.

(§ 2 ch 33 SLA 1969; am § 23 ch 136 SLA 1974; am § 6 ch 136 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 80 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch. 85, SLA 2001, in subsection (a) “education” was substituted for “scholarship” and “an education loan account” was substituted for “a scholarship account.”

Administrative Code. —

For leave rules, see 2 AAC 8.

Sec. 39.20.250.
Terminal leave.

Terminal leave for unused personal leave shall be allowed upon separation from service. The payment equals the cash value of the officer’s or employee’s personal leave balance at the time of separation from state service.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 4 FSSLA 1996.]

The payment authorized by this section is not considered salary or compensation except for purposes of taxation.

History.

(§ 11-5-6 f ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 182 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1960; am § 7 ch 136 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 1979; am §§ 10, 20 ch 4 FSSLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For leave rules, see 2 AAC 8.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 43, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996 provides that, for the purposes of implementing the amendments to subsection (a) made by § 10, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996, “the beginning total cash value of an officer’s or employee’s personal leave balance on July 1, 1996 is calculated by multiplying the officer’s or employee’s personal leave balance as of June 30, 1996 by the officer’s or employee’s annualized hourly rate of pay on July 1, 1996.” Section 44, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996 provides that nothing in that Act, which amended subsection (a), “modifies or terminates the terms of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on July 1, 1996.” Under § 45, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996, the provisions of that act, which amended subsection (a), are not severable, notwithstanding AS

01.10.030

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Application to judicial and permanent legislative employees of the general laws of the state covering leave, including the Department of Administration’s regulation on terminal leave, does not infringe upon the power of the judicial and legislative branches to supervise, hire, or discharge personnel, or the power to determine employee salaries. April 9, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 39.20.255.
Conversion of accrued annual leave to personal leave.

An officer or employee who has accrued annual leave shall have that annual leave transferred to the officer’s or employee’s personal leave account.

History.

(§ 8 ch 136 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For leave rules, see 2 AAC 8.

Sec. 39.20.256.
Transfer of accrued medical leave.

An officer or employee who has accrued medical leave shall have 40 percent of that medical leave transferred to the officer’s or employee’s personal leave account and 60 percent of that medical leave transferred to a medical leave bank. Banked medical leave may be taken only in accordance with this section.

An officer or employee may not take any banked medical leave unless the officer or employee

has no accrued personal leave; and

has a medical disability exceeding 10 consecutive working days in duration; or

has a medical disability exceeding 30 consecutive working days in duration.

Once the requirements of (b) and (d) of this section have been met, an officer or employee may take banked medical leave until the medical disability is terminated or the banked medical leave is exhausted. If an officer or employee qualifies for banked medical leave under (b)(3) of this section, the banked medical leave may be taken for all working days of the medical disability following the 10th working day of the disability.

When leave is taken under (b)(1) and (2) of this section, a department or agency head may require a doctor’s certificate showing the disability. When leave is taken under (b)(3) of this section, the officer or employee must submit a doctor’s certificate showing the disability.

The taking of leave under this section shall be reduced by the amount of wage continuation payments made under AS 23.30 (Alaska Workers’ Compensation Act).

Upon an officer’s or employee’s separation from state service, the officer’s or employee’s banked medical leave shall be canceled without pay.

History.

(§ 8 ch 136 SLA 1978; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 52 SLA 1979)

Administrative Code. —

For leave rules, see 2 AAC 8.

Sec. 39.20.260.
Medical leave. [Repealed, § 15 ch 136 SLA 1978.
For current law see AS 39.20.225(b).]

Sec. 39.20.270.
Court leave.

Notwithstanding AS

39.20.310

(6), court leave shall be granted to an employee who is classified as full time, whether permanent, nonpermanent, or temporary. An officer or employee called to serve as a juror or subpoenaed as a witness is entitled to administrative leave with pay, but compensation received by the employee or to which the employee is entitled, whichever is greater, for service as a juror or witness shall be deducted from pay to which the employee is entitled as a state officer or employee.

History.

(§ 11-5-6 h ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 182 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 80 SLA 2008)

Sec. 39.20.275.
Leave for organ or bone marrow donation.

Notwithstanding AS

39.20.310

(1) — (3) and (6) — (8), paid administrative leave of not more than 80 hours and not less than 40 hours, unless the employee requests fewer hours, shall be granted under this section to an employee who requests leave to make a personal organ or bone marrow donation. Paid administrative leave may include time spent on a screening process to determine whether the employee is a compatible donor.

The director of personnel in the Department of Administration shall adopt regulations to implement this section.

Nothing in this section authorizes employees to request leave for contribution to or for withdrawal from a leave pool.

In this section, “employee” means a paid employee of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of state government, a state public corporation or council established by law, or the University of Alaska, whether the employee is a permanent, nonpermanent, or temporary employee, who is employed for an average of 30 or more scheduled hours each week.

History.

(§ 4 ch 80 SLA 2008)

Sec. 39.20.280.
Maternity leave. [Repealed, § 2 ch 67 SLA 1974.
For current law see AS 39.20.225(b)(4).]

Sec. 39.20.290.
Definition of days of leave.

The days of leave provided for in AS

39.20.200

—

39.20.330

mean days upon which an officer or employee would otherwise work and receive pay, and are exclusive of holidays.

History.

(§ 11-5-6 j ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 182 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1960)

Sec. 39.20.295.
Special regulations on leave period.

In accord with the procedures established in AS

39.20.320

, the Department of Administration shall adopt regulations defining and establishing a uniform beginning and a uniform concluding date for the 12-month periods applicable to leave use and accumulation by officers and employees of state government.

History.

(§ 2 ch 151 SLA 1972)

Sec. 39.20.300.
Personal and banked medical leave transfers with officer or employee.

When an officer or employee terminates employment with one department, office, institution, or agency of the state government and is employed by another department, office, institution, or agency of the state government without break in service, accumulated personal leave and banked medical leave also transfer and shall be credited to the officer or employee in the employing department, office, institution, or agency.

History.

(§ 11-5-6 k ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 182 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1960; am § 9 ch 136 SLA 1978)

Sec. 39.20.305.
Family and health leave.

An officer or employee of the state who is otherwise qualified to take leave of absence may take family leave because of a serious health condition for a total of 18 workweeks during any 24-month period. An otherwise qualified officer or employee may take family leave because of pregnancy and childbirth or adoption for a total of 18 workweeks within a 12-month period; the right to take leave for this reason expires on the date one year after the birth or placement of the child. An officer or employee taking leave under this section shall use accrued paid leave until the officer or employee has only five days of paid leave remaining. The officer or employee may choose whether to retain a balance of five days of paid leave and take the remaining leave as unpaid leave or whether to exhaust the paid leave balance. After reducing accrued paid leave as required by this subsection, the officer or employee may take leave without pay for the balance of the family leave. If the employee is entitled to a longer period of time under AS

39.20.500

, then the longer period applies. An eligible employee is entitled to take family leave

because of pregnancy and the birth of a child of the employee or the placement of a child, other than the employee’s stepchild, with the employee for adoption; the department or agency may require that an employee using family leave under this paragraph take the leave in a single block of time;

in order to care for the employee’s child, spouse, or parent who has a serious health condition; in this paragraph, “child” includes the employee’s biological, adopted, or foster child, stepchild, or legal ward; and

because of the employee’s own serious health condition.

If the necessity for family leave under (a) of this section is foreseeable based on an expected birth or adoption or on planned medical treatment or supervision, the employee shall provide the employee’s department or agency head with prior notice of the expected need for leave in a manner that is reasonable and practicable. If the necessity for leave under this section is foreseeable based on planned medical treatment or supervision, the employee shall also make a reasonable effort to schedule the treatment or supervision so as not to disrupt unduly the operations of the state department or agency, subject to the approval of the health care provider of the employee or the employee’s child, spouse, or parent.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, if a parent or child of two employees employed by the state has a serious health condition, the state is not required to grant family leave to both employees simultaneously.

In this section, “child,” “health care provider,” “parent,” and “serious health condition” have the meanings given in AS

39.20.550

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 96 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, “AS

39.20.500

” was substituted for “AS

23.10.500

” in subsection (a), and “AS

39.20.550

” was substituted for “AS 23.10.550” in subsection (d) to reflect the 2002 renumbering of AS

23.10.500

and 23.10.550.

Collateral references. —

Who is eligible employee under § 101(2) of Family and Medical Leave Act (29 U.S.C.A. § 2611(2)), 166 ALR Fed. 569.

Adequacy of notice to employer of need for leave under Federal Family and Medical Act of 1993, 184 ALR Fed. 171.

Sec. 39.20.310.
Exceptions.

Except as provided in AS

39.20.275

, AS

39.20.200

—

39.20.330

do not apply to

members of the state legislature, the governor, the lieutenant governor, and justices and judges of the supreme and superior courts and of the court of appeals, but nothing in AS

39.20.200

—

39.20.330

may be construed to diminish the salaries fixed by law for these officers by reason of absence from duty on account of illness or otherwise;

magistrates serving the state on less than a full-time basis;

officers, members of the teaching staff, and employees of the University of Alaska;

persons employed in a professional capacity to make a temporary and special inquiry, study, or examination as authorized by the governor, the legislature, or a legislative committee;

members of boards, commissions, and authorities who are not otherwise employed by the state;

temporary employees hired for periods of less than 12 consecutive months;

persons employed by the division of marine transportation as masters and members of the crews operating the state ferry system who are covered by collective bargaining agreements as provided in AS

23.40.040

, except as expressly provided by law;

persons employed by the state who are covered by collective bargaining agreements as provided in AS

23.40.210

, except as expressly provided by law.

History.

(§ 11-5-61 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 182 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 134 SLA 1961; am § 4 ch 93 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1972; am § 10 ch 136 SLA 1978; am § 26 ch 12 SLA 1980; am § 76 ch 59 SLA 1982; am §§ 2, 3 ch 1 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 80 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For leave rules, see 2 AAC 8.

Sec. 39.20.320.
Adoption of regulations.

The director of the division of personnel in the Department of Administration shall prepare and submit regulations necessary to carry out the intent of AS

39.20.200

—

39.20.330

.
These regulations must include provisions for crediting and, if necessary, converting accrued leave when an officer or employee transfers, without break in service, between a department or agency of the state government where the officer or employee is subject to AS

39.20.200

—

39.20.330

and a department or agency of the state government where the officer or employee is not subject to AS 39.20.200 — 39.20.330. These regulations shall be submitted to the commissioner of administration.
The commissioner of administration shall review the regulations and submit them to the personnel board.
The regulations, or any part of the regulations, have the force and effect of law 30 days after they are submitted to the personnel board if not disapproved by the personnel board. Amendments to the regulations shall be prepared and submitted in the same manner, and have the force and effect of law 30 days after they are submitted to the personnel board, if not disapproved by the personnel board.
The regulations adopted under AS 39.20.200 — 39.20.330 relate to the internal management of state agencies and their adoption is not subject to the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 11-5-6 m ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 182 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1960; am § 11 ch 136 SLA 1978; am § 77 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For leave rules, see 2 AAC 8.

Sec. 39.20.330.
Departments to keep leave records.

Each department, office, institution, or agency of the state government shall keep for its files a complete leave record, covering each of its officers and employees, on forms prepared and supplied by the Department of Administration.
These records are subject to annual audit and approval by the director of personnel of the Department of Administration.

History.

(§ 11-5-6 n ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 182 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1960; am § 12 ch 136 SLA 1978)

Sec. 39.20.340.
Leave of absence for reserve or auxiliary members of armed forces.

An employee of the state, or a political subdivision, with the approval of the city council or borough assembly, who is a member of a reserve or auxiliary component of the United States Armed Forces is entitled to a leave of absence without loss of pay, time or efficiency rating on all days during which the employee is ordered to training duty, as distinguished from active duty, with troops or at field exercises, or for instruction, or when under direct military control in the performance of a search and rescue mission. The leave of absence may not exceed 16 1/2 working days in any 12-month period.

If an employee is called to active duty by the governor, an employee otherwise qualified under (a) of this section is entitled to five days leave of absence without loss of pay, time, or efficiency rating.

History.

(§ 1 ch 20 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 154 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 151 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Chapter 49, SLA 1976 changed “12-month period” back to “calendar year” in the last sentence of subsection (a).
As this change was the result of drafting error, “12-month period” has been retained.

Sec. 39.20.345.
Continuation of pay and benefits for certain members of the reserve and auxiliary units of the armed forces.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, the governor, through the issuance of an administrative order, may authorize state employees who are members of a reserve or auxiliary component of the armed forces of the United States, including the organized militia of Alaska, consisting of the Alaska National Guard, the Alaska Naval Militia, and the Alaska State Defense Force, and who are called to active duty by the appropriate state or federal authority to continue to receive the equivalent of their state compensation and some or all of their state benefits.

The Department of Administration shall implement an order issued by the governor under this section. The Department of Administration may adopt emergency regulations to implement an order issued by the governor under this section, including regulations regarding the scope of compensation and benefits and any allocation between the state and the state employee of contributions relating to the benefits. Emergency regulations adopted under this section

are not subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act); and

take effect immediately unless the Department of Administration specifies another date.

In this section, “benefits” includes credited service in a state retirement system, membership in the supplemental employee benefits system under AS

39.30.150

—

39.30.180

, and group life and health insurance provided under AS

39.30.090

—

39.30.095

or under a collective bargaining agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 65 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For applicability of this section to state employees covered by collective bargaining agreements in effect on June 12, 2003, see § 2,
ch. 65, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 39.20.350.
Restoration of reserve members to former positions.

A member of a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces employed by the state, a political subdivision, or a municipal corporation with the approval of the city council, who is ordered to duty by proper authority, shall, when relieved from duty, be restored to the position the employee held when ordered to duty.

History.

(§ 2 ch 20 SLA 1951)

Cross references. —

For Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, see 38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq.